Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SAFE ROUTES TO SCHOOL AND ACTIVE TRANSPORTATION.new text end new text begin $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from ....... to the commissioner of transportation for: (1) the safe routes to school program under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.40; and (2) the active transportation program under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.38. new text end